Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.859

Faculty tenure—Tenure retained upon reduced work load assignment.

An appointing authority may allow a tenured faculty member to retain tenure upon assignment to a reduced work load. The appointing authority and the faculty member shall execute a written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions of the assignment, including the conditions, if any, under which the faculty member may return to full time employment.

[ 1988 c 32 s 1.]